Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-12,219
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-12,219 to 81-12,226 shall be known and may be cited as the Shovel-Ready Capital Recovery and Investment Act.

Laws 2021, LB566, § 1.